Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1923.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 568.1 of Title 57, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For the purposes of this section, “social media platform”
means a website or Internet medium that:
1. Permits a person to become a registered user, establish an
account, or create a profile for the purpose of allowing users to
create, share, and view user-generated content through such an
account or profile;
2. Enables one or more users to generate content that can be
viewed by other users of the medium; and
3. Primarily serves as a medium for users to interact with
content generated by other users of the medium.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1923 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. 1. The Department of Corrections shall prohibit inmates
from accessing social media platforms on any cellular phone, tablet,
computer, or other electronic device provided by the Department.
2. The Department of Corrections shall promulgate rules to
effectuate the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 3, 2026 - DO PASS

















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1923 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)